Montana, session 2025, SB451.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 22-1-302, MCA, is amended to read:
"22-1-302. Purpose -- core functions. (1) It is the purpose of this part to encourage the
establishment, adequate financing, and effective administration of free public libraries in this state to give the
people of Montana the fullest opportunity to enrich and inform themselves through reading.
(2) A free public library established pursuant to the provisions of this part must provide services
that are related to the purpose and the core functions of a public library. The core functions include:
(a) access to information, including printed and digital materials onsite and available through
lending agreements with other libraries;
(b) educational support, resources, and programs for students, including access to research
materials and databases, tutoring, and homework help;
(c) access to technology, including computers, the internet, online learning platforms, and other
tools;
(d) promoting literacy and reading, including by providing programing tailored for different age
groups;
(e) access to meeting spaces for outside organizations and members of the public;
(f) access to reading areas;
(g) facilitation of the transmission and sharing of information, including by offering services for
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 451

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 451.1
copying information or materials; and
(h) any other core function consistent with the purpose of free public libraries as provided by this
section.
(3) A free public library may not offer services that are unrelated to the purpose or core functions of
a public library as provided by this section."
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 451